Illinois, session 104th, HB5155.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Incarceration Demographic Data Transparency Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to require 7the uniform collection and public reporting of demographic 8data for individuals confined in Illinois State correctional 9facilities and county jails, in order to promote transparency, 10equity, and evidence-based criminal justice policy, while 11protecting individual privacy and safety. 12    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:13    "County jail" means any jail, detention center, or 14correctional facility operated by a county sheriff for the 15confinement of persons:16        (1) awaiting trial or disposition; or17        (2) serving a sentence of less than one year.18    "Covered individual" means any person confined in a State 19correctional facility or county jail for any length of time.20    "Demographic data" means information regarding race, 21ethnicity, and gender collected under Section 15 of this Act.22    "De-identified data" means data from which all personally   HB5155- 2 -LRB104 17828 RLC 31262 b1identifying information has been removed, including, but not 2limited to name, date of birth, booking number, and any unique 3identifier.4    "Department" means the Department of Corrections. 5    Section 15. Demographic data collection.6    (a) For each covered individual, the following demographic 7data shall be collected:8        (1) race;9        (2) ethnicity; and10        (3) gender.11    (b) The Department shall establish uniform statewide 12standards for the collection of demographic data that:13        (1) are consistent with applicable federal civil 14    rights reporting requirements;15        (2) promote accuracy and consistency across 16    jurisdictions; and17        (3) protect the dignity, privacy, and safety of 18    confined individuals.19    (c) The standards for gender data collection shall, to the 20extent practicable:21        (1) permit self-identification;22        (2) avoid forced or inaccurate classification; and 23        (3) distinguish between sex assigned at birth and 24    current gender identity.    HB5155- 3 -LRB104 17828 RLC 31262 b1    Section 20. Reporting requirements. 2    (a) The Department shall collect and maintain demographic 3data for all covered individuals confined in State 4correctional facilities.5    (b) Each county sheriff shall collect demographic data for 6covered individuals confined in county jails and shall submit 7such data to the Department in the form and manner prescribed 8by the Department.9    (c) Demographic data shall be submitted and reported at 10least quarterly and shall include:11        (1) snapshot population counts; and12        (2) admissions and releases occurring during the 13    reporting period. 14    Section 25. Public reporting. 15    (a) The Department shall publish demographic data 16collected under this Act on a publicly accessible website in a 17searchable and downloadable format.18    (b) Publicly reported data shall:19        (1) be aggregated and de-identified; and20        (2) exclude or suppress categories where disclosure 21    would create a reasonable risk of identifying an 22    individual.23    (c) Nothing in this Act authorizes the public release of 24personally identifiable information.   HB5155- 4 -LRB104 17828 RLC 31262 b1    Section 30. Oversight and compliance.2    (a) The Department shall oversee implementation and 3compliance with this Act.4    (b) The Department shall provide guidance, reporting 5templates, and technical assistance to county sheriffs as 6necessary to implement this Act. 7    Section 35. Funding. The implementation of this Act is 8subject to appropriation. The Department shall not require 9county compliance with reporting requirements unless 10sufficient funding or technical support is made available by 11the State. 12    Section 40. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 13necessary to implement this Act no later than 12 months after 14the effective date of the Act. 15    Section 45. Enforcement and criminal penalties.16    (a) Any person who knowingly falsifies, alters, or 17fabricates demographic data required to be collected or 18reported under this Act, or who knowingly causes such 19falsification, alteration, or fabrication, commits a Class A 20misdemeanor.21    (b) Any responsible official who knowingly and willfully 22fails to submit required demographic data after receiving 23written notice of noncompliance from the overseeing agency and   HB5155- 5 -LRB104 17828 RLC 31262 b1a reasonable opportunity to cure shall be guilty of a petty 2offense for a first violation and a Class B misdemeanor for a 3second or subsequent violation.4    (c) A person commits a Class A misdemeanor if the person 5knowingly retaliate against a covered individual or employee 6for providing accurate information or for reporting a 7violation of this Act.8    (d) No criminal penalty shall apply to good-faith errors, 9technical mistakes, or omissions that are promptly corrected 10upon notice.11    (e) The criminal penalties provided in this Section do not 12preclude administrative sanctions, civil penalties, injunctive 13relief, or other remedies authorized by law.